english.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Pl +Sg 
+V +PS +PP +FP +PC +FC +FS +PR
+AJ +Cm +Sp +Rg
+NS1 +NS2 +NS3 +NS4 +NS5 +NS6 +NS7 +NS8 +NS9 +NS10 +NS11 +NS12 +NS13 +NS14 +NS15
+AS1 +AS2 +AS3 +AS4 +AS5 +AS6 +AS7 +AS8 +AS9 +AS10 +AS11
+ADV1 +ADV2 +ADV3
+VS1 +VS2 +VS3 +VS4   

LEXICON Root
Prefix  ;
Noun	;
Verb	;
Adj	;
ADV	;
Closed  ;

LEXICON Noun
NREG	;
NIRG	;

LEXICON Adj
AREG	;
AIRG	;

LEXICON Verb
VREG	;
VIRG	;

LEXICON NEnd
+N+Pl:^s	#;
+N+Sg:0		#;

LEXICON VEnd
+V+PS:^ed	#;
+V+PP:^ed	#;
+V+FP:^ed	#;
+V+PC:^ing	#;
+V+FC:^ing	#;
+V+FS:0	#;
+V+PR:0	#;
+V+PR3:^s	#;
VNSuf   ;
VASuf   ;

LEXICON AEnd
+AJ+Cm:^er	#;
+AJ+Sp:^est	#;
+AJ+Rg:0	#;

LEXICON Prefix
UniPref	;
VPref	;
NPref	;
APref	;

LEXICON VPref
over^	Verb;
fore^	Verb;
pre^	Verb;
de^	Verb;
be^	Verb;
un^	Verb;
under^	Verb;
sub^	Verb;
inter^	Verb;
co^	Verb;
re^	Verb;
mis^	Verb;
out^	Verb;

LEXICON NPref
anti^	Noun;
auto^	Noun;
bi^	Noun;
ex^	Noun;
sur^	Noun;
pseudo^	Noun;
semi^	Noun;
neo^	Noun;
poly^	Noun;
mini^	Noun;
mono^	Noun;
tele^	Noun;
super^	Noun;
tri^	Noun;
kilo^	Noun;
mega^	Noun;
hyper^	Noun;
counter^	Noun;
vice^	Noun;
super^	Noun;
ultra^	Noun;
in^	Noun;
re^	Noun;
mis^	Noun;
out^	Noun;
co^	Noun;
inter^	Noun;
sub^	Noun;
under^	Noun;

LEXICON APref
non^	Adj;
ir^	Adj;
im^	Adj;
il^	Adj;
in^	Adj;
un^	Adj;

LEXICON UniPref
dis^	Noun;
dis^	Adj;
dis^	Verb;
0	Noun;
0	Adj;
0	Verb;

LEXICON VIRG
V1unique	;
V2unique	;
V3unique	;

LEXICON VREnd
+V+PC:^ing	#;
+V+FC:^ing	#;
+V+FS:0	#;
+V+PR:0	#;

LEXICON NSuf
+NS1:^age	NEnd;
+NS2:^dom	NEnd;
+NS3:^hood	NEnd;
+NS4:^ism	NEnd;
+NS5:^ist	NEnd;
+NS6:^ship	NEnd;
NASuf   ;
NVSuf   ;
ADVSuf  ;

LEXICON ASuf
+AS1:^al	#;
+AS2:^ly	#;
+AS3:^ish	#;
+AS4:^ive	#;
ANSuf   ;
AVSuf   ;
ADVSuf  ;

LEXICON ADVSuf
+N+ADV1:^wise	#;
+N+ADV2:^ward	#;
+N+ADV3:^wards	#;
+A+ADV1:^ly	#;

LEXICON AIRG
Noun	NASuf;
Verb	VASuf;
Adj ASuf;
AIRGf	;

LEXICON AIRGf
good+AR+Rg:good	#;
good+AR+Cm:better	#;
good+AR+Sp:best	#;
bad+AR+Rg:bad	#;
bad+AR+Cm:worse	#;
bad+AR+Sp:worst	#;
little+AR+Rg:little	#;
little+AR+Cm:less	#;
little+AR+Sp:least	#;
far+AR+Rg:far	#;
far+AR+Cm:further	#;
far+AR+Sp:furthest	#;
far+AR+Cm:farther	#;
far+AR+Sp:farthest	#;

LEXICON NVSuf
+N+VS1:^ate	VEnd;
+N+VS2:^ise	VEnd;
+N+VS3:^ize	VEnd;
+N+VS4:^ify	VEnd;

LEXICON AVSuf
+A+VS1:^ate	VEnd;
+A+VS2:^ise	VEnd;
+A+VS3:^ize	VEnd;

LEXICON ANSuf
+A+NS1:^cy	NEnd;
+A+NS2:^dom	NEnd;
+A+NS3:^ness	NEnd;
+A+NS4:^ist	NEnd;
+A+NS5:^ism	NEnd;
+A+NS6:^ty	NEnd;
+A+NS7:^ity	NEnd;

LEXICON VNSuf
+V+NS1:^age	NEnd;
+V+NS2:^al	NEnd;
+V+NS3:^ance	NEnd;
+V+NS4:^ence	NEnd;
+V+NS5:^er	NEnd;
+V+NS6:^or	NEnd;
+V+NS7:^ee	NEnd;
+V+NS8:^ment	NEnd;
+V+NS9:^ry	NEnd;
+V+NS10:^ery	NEnd;
+V+NS11:^sion	NEnd;
+V+NS12:^tion	NEnd;
+V+NS13:^xion	NEnd;
+V+NS14:^ant	NEnd;
+V+NS15:^ent	NEnd;

LEXICON VASuf
+V+AS1:^y	#;
+V+AS2:^al	#;
+V+AS3:^less	#;
+V+AS4:^ing	#;
+V+AS5:^ic	#;
+V+AS6:^ive	#;
+V+AS7:^able	#;
+V+AS8:^ible	#;

LEXICON NASuf
+N+AS1:^y	#;
+N+AS2:^al	#;
+N+AS3:^ial	#;
+N+AS4:^ly	#;
+N+AS5:^ish	#;
+N+AS6:^ic	#;
+N+AS7:^some	#;
+N+AS8:^ful	#;
+N+AS9:^able	#;
+N+AS10:^ful	#;
+N+AS11:^ous	#;

LEXICON NIRG
aircraft+NR+Pl:aircraft	#;
aircraft+NR+Sg:aircraft	#;
alumna+NR+Pl:alumnae	#;
alumnae+NR+Sg:alumna	#;
bison+NR+Pl:bison	#;
bison+NR+Sg:bison	#;
child+NR+Pl:children	#;
children+NR+Sg:child	#;
foot+NR+Pl:feet	#;
feet+NR+Sg:foot	#;
goose+NR+Pl:geese	#;
geese+NR+Sg:goose	#;
graffito+NR+Pl:graffiti	#;
graffiti+NR+Sg:graffito	#;
louse+NR+Pl:lice	#;
lice+NR+Sg:louse	#;
man+NR+Pl:men	#;
men+NR+Sg:man	#;
minutia+NR+Pl:minutiae	#;
minutiae+NR+Sg:minutia	#;
moose+NR+Pl:moose	#;
moose+NR+Sg:moose	#;
mouse+NR+Pl:mice	#;
mice+NR+Sg:mouse	#;
ox+NR+Pl:oxen	#;
oxen+NR+Sg:ox	#;
sheep+NR+Pl:sheep	#;
sheep+NR+Sg:sheep	#;
swine+NR+Pl:swine	#;
swine+NR+Sg:swine	#;
tooth+NR+Pl:teeth	#;
teeth+NR+Sg:tooth	#;
vita+NR+Pl:vitae	#;
vitae+NR+Sg:vita	#;
woman+NR+Pl:women	#;
women+NR+Sg:woman	#;
LEXICON VIRG
V1unique	;
V2unique	;
V3unique	;

LEXICON VREnd
+V+PC:^ing	#;
+V+FC:^ing	#;
+V+FS:0	#;
+V+PR:0	#;
+V+PR3:^s	#;

LEXICON V1unique
bet	VREnd;
bet+V+PS:bet	#;
bet+V+PP:bet	#;
bet+V+FP:bet	#;
bid	VREnd;
bid+V+PS:bid	#;
bid+V+PP:bid	#;
bid+V+FP:bid	#;
broadcast	VREnd;
broadcast+V+PS:broadcast	#;
broadcast+V+PP:broadcast	#;
broadcast+V+FP:broadcast	#;
cost	VREnd;
cost+V+PS:cost	#;
cost+V+PP:cost	#;
cost+V+FP:cost	#;
cut	VREnd;
cut+V+PS:cut	#;
cut+V+PP:cut	#;
cut+V+FP:cut	#;
hit	VREnd;
hit+V+PS:hit	#;
hit+V+PP:hit	#;
hit+V+FP:hit	#;
hurt	VREnd;
hurt+V+PS:hurt	#;
hurt+V+PP:hurt	#;
hurt+V+FP:hurt	#;
let	VREnd;
let+V+PS:let	#;
let+V+PP:let	#;
let+V+FP:let	#;
put	VREnd;
put+V+PS:put	#;
put+V+PP:put	#;
put+V+FP:put	#;
read	VREnd;
read+V+PS:read	#;
read+V+PP:read	#;
read+V+FP:read	#;
shut	VREnd;
shut+V+PS:shut	#;
shut+V+PP:shut	#;
shut+V+FP:shut	#;

LEXICON ADV
Noun	ADVSuf;
Adj	ADVSuf;
Verb	VNSuf;
Adj	ANSuf;
quality	NEnd;
qual	NSuf;
brain	NEnd;
brain	NSuf;
cat	NEnd;
cat	NSuf;
cap	NEnd;
cap	NSuf;
dish	NEnd;
dish	NSuf;
union	NEnd;
ion	NSuf;
resemble	NEnd;
sembl	NSuf;
basic	NEnd;
bas	NSuf;
emotional	NEnd;
emotion	NSuf;
western	NEnd;
western	NSuf;
scheme	NEnd;
schem	NSuf;
audacity	NEnd;
audac	NSuf;
drum	NEnd;
drum	NSuf;
seclusion	NEnd;
secl	NSuf;
designer	NEnd;
sign	NSuf;
summary	NEnd;
sum	NSuf;
pig	NEnd;
pig	NSuf;
solicit	NEnd;
solicit	NSuf;
instability	NEnd;
stabil	NSuf;
hemisphere	NEnd;
hemispher	NSuf;
arcade	NEnd;
arcad	NSuf;
wherefore	NEnd;
wherefor	NSuf;
ecstatic	NEnd;
ecstatic	NSuf;
accomplishment	NEnd;
accomplishm	NSuf;
hypocritical	NEnd;
crit	NSuf;
trevor	NEnd;
trev	NSuf;
teas	NEnd;
teas	NSuf;
shah	NEnd;
shah	NSuf;
visor	NEnd;
vis	NSuf;
cassock	NEnd;
cassock	NSuf;
lout	NEnd;
lout	NSuf;
caliph	NEnd;
caliph	NSuf;
revisionist	NEnd;
vis	NSuf;
restorer	NEnd;
stor	NSuf;
crafty	NEnd;
craf	NSuf;
beadle	NEnd;
beadl	NSuf;
blacktop	NEnd;
blacktop	NSuf;
promiscuity	NEnd;
promiscu	NSuf;
upcast	NEnd;
upcast	NSuf;
clubhouse	NEnd;
clubhous	NSuf;
clapper	NEnd;
clap	NSuf;
holocaust	NEnd;
holocaust	NSuf;
neurological	NEnd;
neurolog	NSuf;
berliner	NEnd;
berlin	NSuf;
locale	NEnd;
local	NSuf;
statutory	NEnd;
statut	NSuf;
pant	NEnd;
pant	NSuf;
hubbub	NEnd;
hubbub	NSuf;
bouffant	NEnd;
bouf	NSuf;
contention	NEnd;
tent	NSuf;
polisher	NEnd;
pol	NSuf;
madcap	NEnd;
madcap	NSuf;
hydro	NEnd;
hydr	NSuf;
seethe	NEnd;
seeth	NSuf;
cours	NEnd;
urs	NSuf;
brutify	NEnd;
brut	NSuf;
inattention	NEnd;
clon	NEnd;
clon	NSuf;
emissary	NEnd;
emis	NSuf;
coenamor	NEnd;
enam	NSuf;
miscalculate	NEnd;
calculat	NSuf;
benzoate	NEnd;
benz	NSuf;
sunbath	NEnd;
sunbath	NSuf;
individualize	NEnd;
individual	NSuf;
mite	NEnd;
mit	NSuf;
pyrolyze	NEnd;
pyrolyz	NSuf;
hogg	NEnd;
hogg	NSuf;
sashimi	NEnd;
sashim	NSuf;
zephyr	NEnd;
zephyr	NSuf;
numeral	NEnd;
numer	NSuf;
formol	NEnd;
formol	NSuf;
aquaplane	NEnd;
aquaplan	NSuf;
sabotage	NEnd;
sabot	NSuf;
tearjerker	NEnd;
tearjerk	NSuf;
crystallite	NEnd;
crystallit	NSuf;
cosignatory	NEnd;
signat	NSuf;
scutage	NEnd;
scut	NSuf;
pourboire	NEnd;
pourboir	NSuf;
chrysopoetic	NEnd;
chrysopoetic	NSuf;
sambur	NEnd;
sambur	NSuf;
placenta	NEnd;
placent	NSuf;
tryster	NEnd;
tryst	NSuf;
comate	NEnd;
ate	NSuf;
rigatoni	NEnd;
rigaton	NSuf;
gynic	NEnd;
gyn	NSuf;
toller	NEnd;
tol	NSuf;
stewbum	NEnd;
stewbum	NSuf;
smaze	NEnd;
smaz	NSuf;
stuffer	NEnd;
stuf	NSuf;
euphuist	NEnd;
euph	NSuf;
einkorn	NEnd;
einkorn	NSuf;
yahrzeit	NEnd;
yahrzeit	NSuf;
snorer	NEnd;
snor	NSuf;
effacement	NEnd;
effac	NSuf;
suricate	NEnd;
suricat	NSuf;
definer	NEnd;
fin	NSuf;
jinn	NEnd;
jinn	NSuf;
taler	NEnd;
tal	NSuf;
sibship	NEnd;
sib	NSuf;
extorter	NEnd;
extort	NSuf;
superinformality	NEnd;
informal	NSuf;
sumpweed	NEnd;
sumpweed	NSuf;
vaporer	NEnd;
vap	NSuf;
bamboozler	NEnd;
bamboozl	NSuf;
musicotherapy	NEnd;
musicotherapy	NSuf;
versifier	NEnd;
versif	NSuf;
pencel	NEnd;
pencel	NSuf;
boucle	NEnd;
boucl	NSuf;
bionic	NEnd;
bion	NSuf;
okra	NEnd;
okr	NSuf;
agnosia	NEnd;
agnosi	NSuf;
blas	NEnd;
blas	NSuf;
whipstaff	NEnd;
whipstaff	NSuf;
arak	NEnd;
arak	NSuf;
oscillometry	NEnd;
oscillomet	NSuf;
zeolite	NEnd;
zeolit	NSuf;
uncorner	NEnd;
corn	NSuf;
marxist	NEnd;
marx	NSuf;
pinewood	NEnd;
pinewood	NSuf;
makuta	NEnd;
makut	NSuf;
LEXICON VREG
Noun	NVSuf;
Adj	AVSuf;
doubt	VEnd;
secret	VEnd;
garden	VEnd;
self	VEnd;
stuff	VEnd;
enemy	VEnd;
heel	VEnd;
discuss	VEnd;
iron	VEnd;
deny	VEnd;
chap	VEnd;
parallel	VEnd;
vein	VEnd;
pet	VEnd;
dimension	VEnd;
lazy	VEnd;
trap	VEnd;
worship	VEnd;
bitch	VEnd;
gloom	VEnd;
budget	VEnd;
corrupt	VEnd;
halo	VEnd;
preach	VEnd;
barrel	VEnd;
fax	VEnd;
inflict	VEnd;
affirm	VEnd;
hast	VEnd;
buffalo	VEnd;
tier	VEnd;
disarm	VEnd;
psych	VEnd;
chop	VEnd;
hag	VEnd;
flavor	VEnd;
pivot	VEnd;
frangoise	VEnd;
lather	VEnd;
linger	VEnd;
whiten	VEnd;
neigh	VEnd;
vagabond	VEnd;
deacon	VEnd;
counterfeit	VEnd;
overshadow	VEnd;
lengthen	VEnd;
gipsy	VEnd;
mayhem	VEnd;
prim	VEnd;
zoom	VEnd;
clem	VEnd;
unleash	VEnd;
shimmy	VEnd;
windburn	VEnd;
pul	VEnd;
outflow	VEnd;
molest	VEnd;
dishonor	VEnd;
timbrel	VEnd;
cusp	VEnd;
unhook	VEnd;
swivel	VEnd;
catalog	VEnd;
knell	VEnd;
bruit	VEnd;
splatter	VEnd;
speil	VEnd;
transect	VEnd;
compt	VEnd;
coedit	VEnd;
prepunch	VEnd;
deaccession	VEnd;
sugh	VEnd;
blanch	VEnd;
untuck	VEnd;
bemist	VEnd;
depaint	VEnd;
presoak	VEnd;
beleap	VEnd;
dissert	VEnd;
telephotograph	VEnd;
dogtrot	VEnd;
barf	VEnd;
disfrock	VEnd;
skirr	VEnd;
hoarsen	VEnd;
reaffix	VEnd;
outdress	VEnd;
hillo	VEnd;
hirsel	VEnd;
nazify	VEnd;
fossick	VEnd;
glower	VEnd;
cristate	VEnd;
prebenefit	VEnd;
lichenise	VEnd;
geniculate	VEnd;
germanize	VEnd;
stercorate	VEnd;
euphemise	VEnd;
specificate	VEnd;
repas	VEnd;
remultiply	VEnd;
preinsinuate	VEnd;
subverticilate	VEnd;
insularize	VEnd;
remarshal	VEnd;
mongrelise	VEnd;
overwhip	VEnd;
unmount	VEnd;
unincorporate	VEnd;
unpuff	VEnd;
opinionate	VEnd;
acetylate	VEnd;
overmitigate	VEnd;
annualize	VEnd;
undegenerate	VEnd;
uncatholicise	VEnd;
LEXICON V2unique
beat	VREnd;
become	VREnd;
bend	VREnd;
bring	VREnd;
build	VREnd;
burn	VREnd;
buy	VREnd;
catch	VREnd;
come	VREnd;
dig	VREnd;
dream	VREnd;
feel	VREnd;
fight	VREnd;
find	VREnd;
hang	VREnd;
have	VREnd;
hear	VREnd;
hold	VREnd;
keep	VREnd;
lay	VREnd;
lead	VREnd;
learn	VREnd;
leave	VREnd;
lend	VREnd;
lose	VREnd;
make	VREnd;
mean	VREnd;
meet	VREnd;
pay	VREnd;
run	VREnd;
say	VREnd;
sell	VREnd;
send	VREnd;
sit	VREnd;
sleep	VREnd;
spend	VREnd;
stand	VREnd;
teach	VREnd;
tell	VREnd;
think	VREnd;
understand	VREnd;
win	VREnd;
LEXICON V3unique
awake	VREnd;
be	VREnd;
begin	VREnd;
bite	VREnd;
blow	VREnd;
break	VREnd;
choose	VREnd;
do	VREnd;
draw	VREnd;
drive	VREnd;
drink	VREnd;
eat	VREnd;
fall	VREnd;
fly	VREnd;
forget	VREnd;
forgive	VREnd;
freeze	VREnd;
get	VREnd;
give	VREnd;
go	VREnd;
grow	VREnd;
hide	VREnd;
know	VREnd;
lie	VREnd;
ride	VREnd;
ring	VREnd;
rise	VREnd;
see	VREnd;
show	VREnd;
sing	VREnd;
sink	VREnd;
speak	VREnd;
stink	VREnd;
swim	VREnd;
take	VREnd;
tear	VREnd;
throw	VREnd;
wake	VREnd;
wear	VREnd;
write	VREnd;
LEXICON AREG
great	AEnd;
sid	AEnd;
lat	AEnd;
dead	AEnd;
blu	AEnd;
whatev	AEnd;
fre	AEnd;
larg	AEnd;
gam	AEnd;
strong	AEnd;
fals	AEnd;
gentl	AEnd;
soft	AEnd;
lean	AEnd;
dry	AEnd;
mot	AEnd;
quick	AEnd;
surd	AEnd;
slight	AEnd;
solut	AEnd;
modern	AEnd;
loos	AEnd;
dull	AEnd;
clos	AEnd;
weep	AEnd;
splendid	AEnd;
weak	AEnd;
hon	AEnd;
bold	AEnd;
strong	AEnd;
apt	AEnd;
lim	AEnd;
bald	AEnd;
shrill	AEnd;
raw	AEnd;
flush	AEnd;
alert	AEnd;
stal	AEnd;
earn	AEnd;
lav	AEnd;
neat	AEnd;
wis	AEnd;
crud	AEnd;
superb	AEnd;
corrupt	AEnd;
old	AEnd;
rash	AEnd;
faint	AEnd;
dens	AEnd;
chast	AEnd;
hard	AEnd;
northw	AEnd;
sunn	AEnd;
shallow	AEnd;
saf	AEnd;
jupit	AEnd;
fair	AEnd;
tal	AEnd;
faint	AEnd;
cheap	AEnd;
bleak	AEnd;
piss	AEnd;
new	AEnd;
lolasist	AEnd;
alabast	AEnd;
farth	AEnd;
short	AEnd;
bright	AEnd;
rapt	AEnd;
prow	AEnd;
matur	AEnd;
fair	AEnd;
wry	AEnd;
dir	AEnd;
hon	AEnd;
poor	AEnd;
peemst	AEnd;
stanch	AEnd;
proud	AEnd;
mon	AEnd;
fitt	AEnd;
manch	AEnd;
lonel	AEnd;
tid	AEnd;
mickl	AEnd;
creep	AEnd;
chirk	AEnd;
hon	AEnd;
fatt	AEnd;
lax	AEnd;
ser	AEnd;
portl	AEnd;
foth	AEnd;
light	AEnd;
cheesemong	AEnd;
scaremong	AEnd;
ros	AEnd;
steep	AEnd;
scept	AEnd;
splath	AEnd;
drows	AEnd;
suprem	AEnd;
jimm	AEnd;
til	AEnd;
fertilis	AEnd;
found	AEnd;
mission	AEnd;
ver	AEnd;
pap	AEnd;
scept	AEnd;
bigg	AEnd;
helterskelt	AEnd;
air	AEnd;
badd	AEnd;
sob	AEnd;
witt	AEnd;
remarkabl	AEnd;
corn	AEnd;
lush	AEnd;
catercorn	AEnd;
